Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 79. Planning

§§ 2901-2930.
Repealed.
1967, No. 334 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 2931.
Validation of certain commissions.

A regional planning commission in full compliance with sections 2919-2922 of this title on May 31, 1965 shall be a qualified regional planning commission under this chapter in all respects, except that it shall be limited to the financial aid which was in effect for it on May 31, 1965.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 188

.

§ 2932.
Development Board; grants.

The Development Board may with the approval of the Governor award a grant to an incorporated economic development district organized either on an intrastate or interstate basis for the purpose of matching federal funds made available by the Economic Development Administration of the U.S. Department of Commerce.
No grant by the Development Board to a single district shall exceed $15,000.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 160

.